District of Columbia statutes.
28-2501

Definitions.

A bond, when required by or referred to in this Code, means an obligation in a certain sum or penalty, subject to a condition, on breach of which it is to become absolute and enforceable by action.

An undertaking means an agreement entered into by a party to a suit or proceeding, with or without sureties, upon which a judgment or decree may be rendered in the same suit or proceeding against the party and his sureties, if any, the party and sureties submitting themselves to the jurisdiction of the court for that purpose.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 670, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
Attachment and garnishment, affidavits and bonds, see § 16-501.
Sureties, see § 16-4101 et seq.
Undertakings in replevin, see § 16-3704.
1981 Ed., § 28-2501.
1973 Ed., § 28-2501.